Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 16 TLSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 1054 DIVISION I 1 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS ââ TAX CREDIT LIMITS 2 Section 1. Section 15.119, Code 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 15.119 Aggregate tax credit limit for certain economic 5 business development programs. 6 1. a. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in any 7 of the business development programs listed in subsection 2 , 8 the authority, except as provided in paragraph âbâ , shall not 9 authorize for any one fiscal year an amount of tax credits for 10 the programs specified in subsection 2 that is in excess of one 11 hundred seventy ten million dollars. 12 b. (1) The authority may authorize an amount of tax credits 13 during a fiscal year that is in excess of the amount specified 14 in paragraph âaâ , but the amount of such excess shall not exceed 15 twenty percent of the amount specified in paragraph âaâ , and 16 shall be counted against the total amount of tax credits that 17 may be authorized for the next fiscal year. 18 (2) Any amount of tax credits authorized and awarded during 19 a fiscal year for a program specified in subsection 2 which 20 are irrevocably declined by the awarded business or revoked 21 by the authority on or before June 30 of the next fiscal year 22 may be reallocated, authorized, and awarded during the fiscal 23 year in which the declination or revocation occurs. Tax 24 credits authorized pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be 25 considered for purposes of subparagraph (1). 26 2. The authority, with the approval of the board, shall 27 adopt by rule a procedure for allocating the aggregate tax 28 credit limit established in this section among the following 29 The aggregate tax credit limit specified in subsection 1 shall 30 be allocated to business development programs as follows : 31 a. (1) The high quality jobs program administered pursuant 32 to subchapter II, part 13 . 33 (2) In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection 34 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and for each fiscal 35 -1- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 79 H.F. 1054 year thereafter, the authority shall not allocate more than 1 sixty-eight million dollars for purposes of this paragraph. 2 (3) In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection , 3 the authority shall prioritize issuing additional research 4 activities tax credits pursuant to section 15.335 . 5 b. The enterprise zones program administered pursuant to 6 sections 15E.191 through 15E.197, Code 2014 . 7 c. The assistive device tax credit program administered 8 pursuant to section 422.33, subsection 9 . 9 d. The tax credits for investments in qualifying businesses 10 issued pursuant to section 15E.43 . In allocating tax credits 11 pursuant to this subsection , the authority shall allocate two 12 million dollars for purposes of this paragraph, unless the 13 authority determines that the tax credits awarded will be less 14 than that amount. 15 e. a. (1) The tax credits for investments in an innovation 16 fund pursuant to section 15E.52 chapter 15E, subchapter VI, 17 and the seed investor tax credit pursuant to chapter 15E, 18 subchapter IV . In allocating tax credits pursuant to this 19 subsection , the authority shall allocate eight ten million 20 dollars for purposes of this paragraph, unless the authority 21 determines that the tax credits awarded will be less than that 22 amount and the board shall determine the tax credit amount 23 allocated to each program under this paragraph each fiscal 24 year . 25 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the 26 allocation pursuant to this paragraph shall be reduced by any 27 tax credit authorized by the authority prior to July 1, 2026, 28 for an investment in a qualifying business pursuant to chapter 29 15E, subchapter V, Code 2025. This subparagraph is repealed 30 July 1, 2026. 31 f. The redevelopment tax credit program for brownfields 32 and grayfields administered pursuant to sections 15.293A and 33 15.293B . 34 g. The workforce housing tax incentives program administered 35 -2- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 2/ 79 H.F. 1054 pursuant to subchapter II, part 17 . In allocating tax credits 1 pursuant to this subsection , the authority shall not allocate 2 more than thirty-five million dollars for purposes of this 3 paragraph. Of the moneys allocated under this paragraph, 4 seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars shall be 5 reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in small 6 cities, as defined in section 15.352 , that are registered on 7 or after July 1, 2017. 8 h. The renewable chemical production tax credit program 9 administered pursuant to subchapter II, part 12 . In allocating 10 tax credits pursuant to this subsection for the fiscal year 11 beginning July 1, 2021, and for each fiscal year beginning 12 before July 1, 2037, the authority shall not allocate more than 13 five million dollars for purposes of this paragraph. This 14 paragraph is repealed July 1, 2039. 15 3. In allocating the amount of tax credits authorized 16 pursuant to subsection 1 among the programs specified in 17 subsection 2 , the authority shall not allocate more than 18 fifteen million dollars for purposes of subsection 2 , paragraph 19 âfâ . 20 b. The renewable chemical production tax credit pursuant 21 to subchapter II, part 12, and the sustainable aviation fuel 22 production tax credit program pursuant to subchapter II, part 23 36. In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection, the 24 authority shall allocate ten million dollars for purposes of 25 this paragraph, and the board shall determine the tax credit 26 amount allocated to each program specified in this paragraph 27 for each fiscal year. 28 c. The research and development tax credit program pursuant 29 to subchapter II, part 35. In allocating tax credits pursuant 30 to this subsection, the authority shall allocate forty million 31 dollars for purposes of this paragraph. 32 d. The business incentives for growth program administered 33 pursuant to subchapter II, part 33. In allocating tax credits 34 pursuant to this subsection for the fiscal year beginning July 35 -3- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 3/ 79 H.F. 1054 1, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the authority 1 shall not allocate more than fifty million dollars for purposes 2 of this paragraph. 3 e. (1) The high-quality jobs program administered pursuant 4 to chapter 15, subchapter II, part 13, and the business 5 incentives for growth program administered pursuant to chapter 6 15, subchapter II, part 33. In allocating tax credits pursuant 7 to this subsection, the authority shall allocate fifty million 8 dollars in the aggregate for purposes of this paragraph, by 9 allocating tax credits to the high-quality jobs program prior 10 to January 1, 2026, and by allocating the remaining tax credits 11 to the business incentives for growth program on or after 12 January 1, 2026. 13 (2) This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2026. 14 4. 3. The authority shall submit to the department of 15 revenue on or before August 15 of each year a report on the tax 16 credits allocated pursuant to this section and the tax credits 17 awarded under each of the programs described in subsection 2 . 18 DIVISION II 19 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS ââ TAX CREDIT LIMITS 20 CONFORMING CHANGES 21 Sec. 2. Section 15.293A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 6. The amount of tax credits that may be awarded by the 24 board shall be subject to the limitation in section 15.119 25 Except as provided in section 15.293B, subsection 6, the board 26 shall not award in any one fiscal year an amount of tax credits 27 that exceeds fifteen million dollars . 28 Sec. 3. Section 15.293B, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 6. a. (1) Tax credits revoked under subsection 3 including 31 tax credits revoked up to five years prior to July 1, 2021, and 32 tax credits not awarded under subsection 4 or 5 , may be awarded 33 in the next annual application period established in subsection 34 1 , paragraph âcâ . 35 -4- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 4/ 79 H.F. 1054 (2) Any amount of tax credits authorized and awarded during 1 a fiscal year which are irrevocably declined by the awarded 2 investor on or before June 30 of the immediately succeeding 3 fiscal year may be awarded in the next annual application 4 period established in subsection 1, paragraph âcâ . 5 b. Tax credits awarded pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall not 6 be counted against the limit under section 15.119, subsection 3 7 15.293A, subsection 6 . 8 Sec. 4. Section 15.318, subsection 3, paragraph e, Code 9 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 e. In each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2023 11 2025 , and ending on or before June 30, 2036, the authority may 12 award an amount of tax credits under the program not to exceed 13 the maximum aggregate amount allocated in determined by the 14 board pursuant to section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph âhâ 15 âbâ . 16 Sec. 5. Section 15.354, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. All completed applications shall be reviewed and 19 scored on a competitive basis by the authority pursuant to 20 rules adopted by the authority. In scoring applications, the 21 authority may award additional points for all of the following: 22 (1) A housing project located in a community where no 23 housing project has been awarded a tax incentive under the 24 program in the immediately preceding three application periods. 25 (2) A housing project located in a community where a recent 26 or planned business expansion, or a new business, has received 27 a tax incentive or financial assistance under the high-quality 28 jobs program administered pursuant to subchapter II, part 13, 29 the major economic growth attraction program administered 30 pursuant to subchapter II, part 32, or the business incentives 31 for growth program administered pursuant to subchapter II, part 32 33. 33 Sec. 6. Section 15.354, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 34 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 35 -5- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 5/ 79 H.F. 1054 following: 1 4. Maximum tax incentives amount. 2 a. (1) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 3 ending June 30, 2026, the authority shall not award an amount 4 of tax credits in excess of thirty-nine million five hundred 5 thousand dollars. 6 (2) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 7 June 30, 2027, the authority shall not award an amount of tax 8 credits in excess of thirty-six million five hundred thousand 9 dollars. 10 (3) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 11 fiscal year thereafter, the authority shall not award an amount 12 of tax credits in excess of thirty-five million dollars. 13 b. Of the tax credits allocated under paragraph âaâ , fifty 14 percent of the allocation available in each fiscal year shall 15 be reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in 16 small cities. 17 c. Notwithstanding paragraph âbâ , if the sum of the amount 18 of tax incentives awarded in a given fiscal year for housing 19 projects located in small cities based on the authorityâs 20 review and scoring of applications does not exceed the amount 21 reserved for housing projects located in small cities pursuant 22 to paragraph âbâ , the authority may award the remaining amount 23 of tax incentives reserved for housing projects located in 24 small cities to other housing projects during that same fiscal 25 year. 26 d. Tax credits revoked by the authority or irrevocably 27 declined by a housing business before June 30 of the fiscal 28 year following the award may be awarded during the fiscal year 29 the revocation or declination occurs. Tax credits awarded 30 pursuant to this paragraph shall not be counted against the tax 31 credit limit established in paragraph âaâ . 32 e. The maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives that 33 may be awarded and issued under section 15.355 to a housing 34 business for a housing project shall not exceed one million 35 -6- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 6/ 79 H.F. 1054 dollars. 1 f. If a housing business qualifies for a higher amount 2 of tax incentives under section 15.355 than is allowed by 3 the limitation imposed in paragraph âeâ , the authority and 4 the housing business may negotiate an apportionment of the 5 reduction in tax incentives between the sales tax refund 6 provided in section 15.355, subsection 2, and the workforce 7 housing investment tax credits provided in section 15.355, 8 subsection 3, provided the total aggregate amount of tax 9 incentives after the apportioned reduction does not exceed the 10 amount in paragraph âeâ . 11 g. The authority shall issue tax incentives under the 12 program on a first-come, first-served basis until the maximum 13 amount of tax incentives allowed under paragraph âaâ is reached. 14 Sec. 7. Section 15.354, subsection 6, paragraph d, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 d. The authority shall administer tax credit allocations 17 for disaster recovery housing projects separately from the 18 general allocation and separately from the allocation reserved 19 for small cities in section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph 20 âgâ . The authority shall issue tax incentives under the 21 program for disaster recovery housing projects on a first-come, 22 first-served basis until the maximum amount of tax incentives 23 allocated under section 15.119, subsection 5 , is reached. The 24 authority shall maintain a list of disaster recovery housing 25 projects awarded tax incentives under the program, so that if 26 the maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives allocated for 27 disaster recovery housing projects under the program is reached 28 in a given fiscal year, such disaster recovery housing projects 29 that were completed but for which tax incentives were not 30 issued shall be placed on a wait list in the order the disaster 31 recovery housing projects were awarded tax incentives pursuant 32 to paragraph âcâ , and shall be given priority for receiving 33 tax incentives in succeeding fiscal years maximum tax credit 34 amounts specified in section 15.354, subsection 4, paragraphs 35 -7- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 7/ 79 H.F. 1054 âaâ and âbâ . 1 DIVISION III 2 BUSINESS INCENTIVES FOR GROWTH PROGRAM 3 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 15.111 Assistance for certain programs 4 and projects. 5 1. a. Under the authority provided in section 15.106A, 6 there shall be established one or more funds within the state 7 treasury, under the control of the authority, to be used for 8 purposes of this section. 9 b. A fund established for purposes of this section shall 10 consist of any moneys appropriated to the authority for 11 purposes of this section, or moneys otherwise accruing to 12 the authority and deposited in the fund for purposes of this 13 section. 14 c. Interest or earnings on moneys in a fund used for the 15 purposes of this section, and all repayments or recaptures of 16 the assistance provided under this section, shall accrue to 17 the authority and shall be used for purposes of this section, 18 notwithstanding section 12C.7. Moneys in a fund are not 19 subject to section 8.33. 20 2. a. The moneys in a fund established for purposes of 21 this section, as described in subsection 1, shall be allocated 22 by the authority in appropriate amounts to be used for the 23 following purposes: 24 (1) For program support. For purposes of this subparagraph, 25 âprogram supportâ means the services necessary for the efficient 26 administration of a program administered by the authority, 27 including but not limited to administrative costs, conducting a 28 statewide laborshed study in coordination with the department 29 of workforce development, outreach to business and marketing 30 programs, the procurement of technical assistance, and the 31 implementation of information technology. 32 (2) For deposit in the innovation and commercialization 33 development fund created pursuant to section 15.412. 34 (3) For providing financial assistance to businesses 35 -8- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 8/ 79 H.F. 1054 engaged in disaster recovery. For purposes of this 1 subparagraph, âbusiness engaged in disaster recoveryâ means 2 a business located in an area declared a disaster area by a 3 federal official, that has sustained physical damage, has 4 closed as a result of a natural disaster, and has a plan for 5 reopening that includes employing a substantial number of the 6 employees the business employed before the natural disaster 7 occurred. 8 (4) For deposit in the entrepreneur investment awards 9 program fund pursuant to section 15E.363. 10 (5) For deposit in a fund created for purposes of the 11 strategic infrastructure program established pursuant to 12 section 15.313. 13 (6) For deposit in the nuisance property remediation fund 14 established pursuant to section 15.338. 15 (7) For deposit in the community catalyst building 16 remediation fund established pursuant to section 15.231. 17 (8) For providing financial assistance to eligible 18 businesses for the business incentives for growth program 19 pursuant to section 15.504. 20 b. Each fiscal year, the authority shall estimate the 21 amount of revenues available for purposes of this section and 22 shall develop a budget appropriate for the expenditure of the 23 revenues available. 24 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 15.502 Short title. 25 This part shall be known and may be cited as the âBusiness 26 Incentives for Growth Programâ or âBIG Programâ . 27 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 15.503 Definitions. 28 As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: 29 1. âBase employment levelâ means the number of full-time 30 equivalent positions at a business, as established by the 31 authority and the business using the businessâs payroll 32 records, as of the date the business applies for tax incentives 33 under the program. 34 2. âBenefitsâ means nonwage compensation provided to an 35 -9- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 9/ 79 H.F. 1054 employee. âBenefitsâ include medical and dental insurance, a 1 pension, a retirement plan, a profit-sharing plan, child care, 2 life insurance, vision insurance, and disability insurance. 3 3. âCommunityâ means a city, county, or entity established 4 pursuant to chapter 28E. 5 4. âContract completionâ means the date of completion of 6 the terms of a contract between a contractor and an eligible 7 business. 8 5. âContractorâ means a person that has executed a contract 9 with an eligible business for the provision of property, 10 materials, or services for the construction or equipping of a 11 facility that is part of the eligible businessâs project. 12 6. âCreated jobsâ or âcreate jobsâ means new, permanent, 13 full-time equivalent positions added to an eligible businessâs 14 payroll, at the location of the eligible businessâs project, in 15 excess of the eligible businessâs base employment level. 16 7. âData center businessâ means the same as defined in 17 section 423.3, subsection 95. 18 8. âEligible businessâ means a business that meets the 19 requirements of section 15.504. 20 9. âFull-time equivalent positionâ means a non-part-time 21 position for the number of hours or days per week considered 22 to be full-time work for the kind of service or work performed 23 for an employer. Typically, a full-time equivalent position 24 requires two thousand eighty hours of work in a calendar year, 25 including all paid holidays, vacations, sick time, and other 26 paid leave. 27 10. âProgramâ means the business incentives for growth 28 program. 29 11. âProjectâ means an activity or set of activities 30 directly related to the start-up, location, modernization, or 31 expansion of an eligible business and proposed in an eligible 32 businessâs application to the program, that will accomplish the 33 goals of the program. 34 12. âProject completion dateâ means the date by which an 35 -10- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 10/ 79 H.F. 1054 eligible business that has been approved by the authority to 1 participate in the program agrees to complete the terms and 2 conditions of the agreement under section 15.506. 3 13. âProject completion periodâ means the period of time 4 between the date the authority approves an eligible business to 5 participate in the program and the project completion date. 6 14. âQualifying investmentâ means a capital investment 7 in real property, including the purchase price of the land 8 and existing buildings and structures, site preparation, 9 improvements to the real property, building construction, and 10 long-term lease costs. âQualifying investmentâ also means 11 a capital investment in depreciable assets for use in the 12 operation of an eligible business. 13 15. âQualifying wage thresholdâ means the mean wage level 14 represented by the wages within two standard deviations of 15 the mean wage within the laborshed area in which the eligible 16 business is located, as calculated by the authority by rule, 17 using the most current covered wage and employment data 18 available from the department of workforce development for the 19 laborshed area in which the eligible business is located. 20 16. âRetained jobâ means a full-time equivalent position 21 that is in existence at the time an eligible business applies 22 for the program that remains continuously filled, and that is 23 at risk of elimination if the proposed project for which the 24 eligible business is applying to the program does not proceed. 25 17. âSubcontractorâ means a person that contracts with 26 a contractor for the provision of property, materials, or 27 services for the construction or equipping of a facility that 28 is part of an eligible businessâs project. 29 18. âTax incentivesâ means tax credits, tax refunds, or tax 30 exemptions authorized under the program by the authority for an 31 eligible business. 32 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 15.504 Eligible business. 33 1. To be eligible to receive tax incentives under 34 the program, a business must meet all of the following 35 -11- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 11/ 79 H.F. 1054 requirements: 1 a. The community in which the proposed project is located 2 must approve the project either by ordinance or resolution. 3 b. (1) The business must be primarily engaged in advanced 4 manufacturing, bioscience, insurance and finance, or technology 5 and innovation. The business shall not be a data center 6 business, a retail business, or a business where a cover charge 7 or membership requirement restricts certain individuals from 8 entering the business. 9 (2) Factors the authority shall consider to determine if 10 a business is primarily engaged in advanced manufacturing, 11 biosciences, insurance and finance, or technology and 12 innovation shall include but are not limited to all of the 13 following: 14 (a) The businessâs North American industry classification 15 system code. 16 (b) The businessâs main sources of revenue. 17 (c) The businessâs customer base. 18 c. (1) The business must not be solely relocating 19 operations from one area of the state to another area of 20 the state. A proposed project that does not create jobs or 21 involve a substantial amount of new capital investment shall 22 be presumed to be a relocation of operations. For purposes of 23 this subparagraph, the authority shall consider a letter from 24 the affected local communityâs government officials supporting 25 the businessâs move away from the affected local community 26 in making a determination whether the business is solely 27 relocating operations. 28 (2) This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit 29 a business from expanding the businessâs operations in a 30 community if the business has similar operations in this state 31 that are not closing or undergoing a substantial reduction in 32 operations. 33 d. The business must offer comprehensive benefits to each 34 full-time equivalent employee employed at the project. The 35 -12- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 12/ 79 H.F. 1054 authority may adopt rules under chapter 17A to determine the 1 procedure for establishing requirements for comprehensive 2 benefits. 3 e. (1) The business must not have a record of violations of 4 the law or of rules, including but not limited to antitrust, 5 environmental, trade, or worker safety, that over a period of 6 time show a consistent pattern or that establish the businessâs 7 intentional, criminal, or reckless conduct in violation of such 8 laws or rules. 9 (2) If the authority determines that the business has a 10 record of violations described in subparagraph (1), and the 11 authority finds that the violations did not seriously affect 12 public health, public safety, or the environment, the business 13 may be eligible to qualify for the program. 14 (3) If the authority determines that the business has 15 a record of violations described in subparagraph (1), and 16 the authority finds that there were mitigating circumstances 17 related to the violations, the business may be eligible to 18 qualify for the program. 19 (4) In making determinations and findings under 20 subparagraphs (2) and (3), and making a determination whether a 21 business is disqualified from the program, the authority shall 22 be exempt from chapter 17A. 23 2. In determining if a business is eligible to participate 24 in the program, the authority shall consider a variety of 25 factors, including but not limited to all of the following: 26 a. The impact of the businessâs proposed project on 27 businesses that are in competition with the business. 28 The authority shall make a good-faith effort to identify 29 existing Iowa businesses in competition with the business 30 being considered for the program. The authority shall make 31 a good-faith effort to determine the probability that any 32 proposed tax incentives will displace employees of the 33 competing businesses. 34 b. The businessâs proposed projectâs economic impact on 35 -13- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 13/ 79 H.F. 1054 the state. The authority shall place greater emphasis on 1 businesses and proposed projects that meet the following 2 requirements: 3 (1) The business has a high proportion of in-state 4 suppliers. 5 (2) The proposed project will diversify the state economy. 6 (3) The business has few in-state competitors. 7 (4) The proposed project has the potential to create jobs on 8 an ongoing basis, or will result in increased skills and wages 9 for employees of the eligible business. 10 (5) The proposed project has the potential to increase 11 productivity, efficiency, and competitiveness through adoption 12 and integration of smart technologies including specialized 13 hardware, software, or other equipment. 14 (6) The proposed project has the potential to increase the 15 stateâs overall gross domestic product. 16 (7) Any other factors the authority deems relevant in 17 determining the economic impact of a proposed project. 18 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 15.505 Applications ââ authorization 19 of tax credits and exemptions. 20 1. a. Applications for the program shall be submitted 21 to the authority in the form and manner prescribed by the 22 authority by rule. Each application must be accompanied by an 23 application fee in an amount determined by the authority by 24 rule. 25 b. For a proposed project that will result in elevated 26 water consumption by the business, the application shall be 27 accompanied by a water conservation and waste reduction plan, 28 and shall be submitted to the authority in the form and manner 29 prescribed by the authority by rule. 30 2. In determining the eligibility of a business to 31 participate in the program, the authority may engage outside 32 experts to complete a technical, financial, or other review of 33 an application submitted by a business. 34 3. a. The authority and the board may negotiate with an 35 -14- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 14/ 79 H.F. 1054 eligible business regarding the terms of, and the aggregate 1 value of, the tax incentives the eligible business may receive 2 under the program. The maximum aggregate value of the tax 3 incentives that any one eligible business may receive shall 4 not exceed five percent of the eligible businessâs qualifying 5 investment, unless the eligible businessâs project is located 6 in a rural county, in which case the maximum aggregate value 7 of tax incentives that any one eligible business may receive 8 shall not exceed seven and one-half percent of the eligible 9 businessâs qualifying investment. For purposes of this 10 paragraph, ârural countyâ means a county in the state with a 11 population of twenty thousand or less based on the most recent 12 decennial census released by the United States census bureau. 13 b. The board may authorize any combination of tax incentives 14 available under the program for an eligible business. 15 4. The board shall not authorize an award under this part 16 before January 1, 2026. 17 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 15.506 Agreement. 18 1. An eligible business that is approved by the authority to 19 participate in the program shall enter into an agreement with 20 the authority that specifies the criteria for the successful 21 completion of all requirements of the program. The agreement 22 must contain, at a minimum, provisions related to all of the 23 following: 24 a. The eligible business must certify to the authority 25 annually that the business is in compliance with the agreement. 26 b. If the eligible business fails to comply with any 27 requirements of the program or the agreement, as determined 28 by the authority, the eligible business may be required to 29 repay any tax incentives the authority issued to the eligible 30 business. After a final determination by the authority, the 31 authority will notify the department of revenue of any required 32 repayment of a tax incentive, which shall be considered a 33 tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by 34 any taxpayer that claimed the tax incentive, and the failure 35 -15- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 15/ 79 H.F. 1054 to make the repayment may be treated by the department of 1 revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown 2 due, or required to be shown due, with the filing of a return 3 or deposit form. A county shall have the authority to take 4 action to recover the value of property taxes not collected as 5 a result of the exemption provided to the business under this 6 part. 7 c. If the eligible business undergoes a layoff or 8 permanently closes any of its facilities within the state, the 9 eligible business may be subject to all of the following: 10 (1) A reduction or elimination of some or all of the tax 11 incentives the authority issued to the eligible business. 12 (2) Repayment of any tax incentives that the business 13 has claimed, and payment of any penalties assessed by the 14 department of revenue. 15 d. The project completion date, the agreement end date, 16 the base employment level, any retained jobs, the number of 17 created jobs, the qualifying wage threshold that is applicable 18 to the project, the amount of qualifying investment, the 19 maximum aggregate value of the tax incentives authorized by the 20 board, and any other terms and obligations the authority deems 21 necessary or material to the determination of the businessâs 22 eligibility for the program, or the aggregate value of tax 23 incentives approved by the board. 24 e. The eligible business shall only employ individuals 25 legally authorized to work in this state. If the eligible 26 business is found to knowingly employ individuals who are 27 not legally authorized to work in this state, in addition 28 to any penalties provided by law, all or a portion of any 29 tax incentives issued by the authority shall be subject 30 to repayment as described in section 15.506, subsection 1, 31 paragraph âbâ . 32 f. Any terms deemed necessary by the authority to effect the 33 eligible businessâs ongoing compliance with section 15.504. 34 2. The business shall satisfy all applicable terms of 35 -16- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 16/ 79 H.F. 1054 the agreement by the project completion date; however, the 1 board may for good cause extend the project completion date or 2 otherwise amend the terms of the agreement. The board shall 3 not amend the terms of the agreement to allow an increase in 4 the maximum aggregate value of the tax incentives authorized by 5 the board under section 15.505, subsection 3. 6 3. The eligible business shall comply with all applicable 7 terms of the agreement until the agreement end date. An 8 eligible business shall maintain the businessâs base employment 9 level until the agreement end date. 10 4. The eligible business shall not assign the agreement 11 to another entity without the advance written approval of the 12 board. 13 5. The authority may enforce the terms of the agreement as 14 necessary and appropriate. 15 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 15.507 Sales and use tax refund. 16 1. An eligible business that has been issued a tax incentive 17 certificate under the program shall be entitled to a refund, 18 as negotiated under section 15.505, subsection 3, of the sales 19 and use taxes paid under chapter 423 for gas, electricity, 20 water, and sewer utility services, tangible personal property, 21 or on services rendered, furnished, or performed to or for 22 a contractor or subcontractor and used in the fulfillment 23 of a written contract for the construction or equipping of 24 a facility that is part of the eligible businessâs project. 25 Taxes attributable to intangible property and furniture and 26 furnishings shall not be refunded. 27 2. To receive the sales and use tax refund, the eligible 28 business shall file a claim with the department of revenue as 29 follows: 30 a. The contractor or subcontractor shall state under oath, 31 on forms provided by the department of revenue, the amount of 32 the sales of tangible personal property or services rendered, 33 furnished, or performed including water, sewer, gas, and 34 electric utility services upon which sales or use tax has been 35 -17- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 17/ 79 H.F. 1054 paid during the period for which the refund is claimed, and 1 shall submit the forms to the eligible business before contract 2 completion. 3 b. The eligible business shall, no more frequently than 4 quarterly, submit an application to the department of revenue 5 for a refund of the amount of the sales and use taxes paid 6 pursuant to chapter 423 upon any tangible personal property, or 7 services rendered, furnished, or performed, including water, 8 sewer, gas, and electric utility services. The application 9 shall be submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the 10 department of revenue. The department of revenue shall audit 11 the application and, if approved, issue a warrant or warrants 12 to the eligible business in the amount of the sales or use tax 13 which has been paid to the state of Iowa under subsection 1. 14 The eligible businessâs final application must be submitted to 15 the department of revenue within one year after the project 16 completion date. An application filed by the eligible business 17 in accordance with this section shall not be denied by reason 18 of a time limitation for filing a refund claim set forth in 19 section 423.47. 20 c. The refund shall be remitted by the department of 21 revenue to the eligible business as soon as practicable after 22 completion of the audit pursuant to paragraph âbâ . Interest 23 shall not accrue on any part of the refund that has not yet been 24 remitted by the department of revenue to the eligible business. 25 3. A contractor or subcontractor that willfully makes a 26 false report of tax paid under this section is guilty of an 27 aggravated misdemeanor, and shall be liable for payment of the 28 tax and any applicable penalty and interest. 29 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 15.508 Qualifying investment tax 30 credit. 31 1. The authority may authorize a tax credit for an eligible 32 business pursuant to section 15.505, subsection 3. The 33 authority shall not issue a tax credit certificate to the 34 eligible business until the eligible businessâs project or a 35 -18- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 18/ 79 H.F. 1054 portion of the project has been placed in service. An eligible 1 business may claim the tax credit authorized and issued by the 2 authority. The tax credit shall be amortized to the eligible 3 business equally over five tax years. The tax credit shall be 4 allowed against taxes imposed under chapter 422, subchapter II, 5 III, or V, and against the moneys and credits tax imposed in 6 section 533.329. If the eligible business is a partnership, S 7 corporation, limited liability company, cooperative organized 8 under chapter 501 and filing as a partnership for federal tax 9 purposes, or estate or trust electing to have the income taxed 10 directly to the individual, an individual may claim the tax 11 credit allowed. The amount claimed by the individual shall 12 be based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings 13 of the partnership, S corporation, limited liability company, 14 cooperative organized under chapter 501 and filing as a 15 partnership for federal tax purposes, or estate or trust. Any 16 tax credit in excess of the eligible businessâs tax liability 17 for the tax year may be refunded. In lieu of claiming a refund, 18 an eligible business may elect to have the overpayment shown 19 on the eligible businessâs final, completed return credited 20 to the eligible businessâs tax liability for the immediately 21 succeeding tax year. A tax credit shall not be carried back 22 to a tax year prior to the tax year in which the tax credit is 23 first claimed by the eligible business. 24 2. If within five years of the date the authority issues 25 an eligible business a tax credit under subsection 1 the 26 eligible business sells, disposes of, razes, or otherwise 27 renders unusable all or a part of the land, buildings, or 28 other structures for which the tax credit was claimed under 29 this section, the tax liability of the eligible business for 30 the year in which all or part of the land, buildings, or other 31 existing structures are sold, disposed of, razed, or otherwise 32 rendered unusable shall be increased by one of the following 33 amounts: 34 a. One hundred percent of the tax credit claimed under 35 -19- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 19/ 79 H.F. 1054 this section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other 1 structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this 2 section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within one 3 year after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the 4 eligible business. 5 b. Eighty percent of the tax credit claimed under this 6 section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other 7 structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this 8 section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within two 9 years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the 10 eligible business. 11 c. Sixty percent of the tax credit claimed under this 12 section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other 13 structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this 14 section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within three 15 years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the 16 eligible business. 17 d. Forty percent of the tax credit claimed under this 18 section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other 19 structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this 20 section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within four 21 years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the 22 eligible business. 23 e. Twenty percent of the tax credit claimed under this 24 section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other 25 structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this 26 section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within five 27 years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the 28 eligible business. 29 f. Except as provided in section 15.119, subsection 1, 30 paragraph âbâ , the board shall not authorize for any one fiscal 31 year an amount of tax credits pursuant to this section that 32 exceeds the amount allocated pursuant to section 15.119, 33 subsection 2. 34 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 15.509 Other incentives. 35 -20- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 20/ 79 H.F. 1054 1. An eligible business may apply for and be eligible to 1 receive other federal, state, and local incentives in addition 2 to the tax incentives issued by the authority to the eligible 3 business under the program. 4 2. The authority, in its discretion, may prohibit an 5 eligible business that has been issued tax incentives under 6 the program from receiving any additional tax incentive, tax 7 credit, grant, loan, or other financial assistance under any 8 program administered by the authority. 9 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 15.510 Property tax exemption. 10 1. If an eligible business has been authorized by the board 11 to receive tax incentives under the program, a community in 12 which the eligible businessâs project is located may grant the 13 eligible business a property tax exemption for a portion of the 14 actual value added by improvements to real property through the 15 project. The community may allow a property tax exemption for 16 a period not to exceed ten years beginning the year that the 17 improvements to real property are first assessed for taxation. 18 2. For purposes of this section, âimprovementsâ means new 19 construction, and rehabilitation of and additions to existing 20 structures. 21 3. A property tax exemption granted under subsection 1 shall 22 apply to all taxing districts, except for school districts, in 23 which the real property is located. 24 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 15.511 Financial assistance for 25 certain eligible businesses. 26 1. The authority may provide financial assistance to an 27 eligible business pursuant to section 15.111, subsection 2, 28 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (8), if the authority and the board 29 find such assistance necessary to facilitate the projectâs 30 successful completion, that the project has an extensive 31 economic impact, or that financial assistance will incentivize 32 an eligible business to choose an Iowa location, rather than an 33 out-of-state location, for the project. 34 2. Each eligible business receiving assistance under this 35 -21- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 21/ 79 H.F. 1054 section shall enter into an agreement with the authority and 1 the agreement shall meet the requirements of section 15.506. 2 The agreement shall specify the circumstances under which the 3 financial assistance must be repaid to the authority. 4 3. If the authority and the board determine financial 5 assistance should be awarded, the authority and the board shall 6 determine the appropriate amount and type of assistance for 7 facilitating the eligible businessâs project. 8 4. For purposes of this section, âfinancial assistanceâ 9 means assistance provided exclusively from the funds, rights, 10 and assets legally available to the authority pursuant to this 11 chapter and includes but is not limited to assistance in the 12 form of grants, loans, forgivable loans, and royalty payments. 13 Sec. 19. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed 14 to designate sections 15.502 through 15.511, as enacted in this 15 division of this Act, as part 33 of subchapter II. 16 Sec. 20. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 17 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18 DIVISION IV 19 ELIMINATION OF THE HIGH QUALITY JOBS PROGRAM 20 Sec. 21. REPEAL. Sections 15.326, 15.327, 15.329, 15.330, 21 15.330A, 15.331A, 15.331C, 15.332, 15.333, 15.333A, 15.335, 22 15.335A, 15.335B, 15.335C, and 15.336, Code 2025, are repealed. 23 Sec. 22. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. 24 1. An agreement entered into on or before December 31, 2025, 25 by a business and the economic development authority pursuant 26 to section 15.330, Code 2025, or amended pursuant to section 27 15.330A, Code 2025, shall be valid and continue per the terms 28 of the agreement. 29 2. On the effective date of this division of this Act, all 30 moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the authority 31 for purposes of section 15.335B shall remain available to 32 the authority for purposes of section 15.111, as enacted by 33 this Act. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys transferred 34 in accordance with this section that remain unencumbered or 35 -22- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 22/ 79 H.F. 1054 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 1 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 2 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3 Sec. 23. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. This division of 4 this Act shall not limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect 5 any amount of tax incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before 6 December 31, 2025, nor shall it limit, modify, or otherwise 7 adversely affect a taxpayerâs right to claim or redeem a tax 8 incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before December 31, 2025, 9 including but not limited to any tax credit carry forward 10 amount. 11 Sec. 24. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 12 effect December 31, 2025. 13 DIVISION V 14 HIGH QUALITY JOBS PROGRAM 15 CONFORMING CHANGES 16 Sec. 25. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph a, 17 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 18 subparagraph. 19 Sec. 26. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph a, 20 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 (2) The tax credits for increasing research activities 22 available under sections 15.335, 422.10 , and 422.33 . 23 Sec. 27. Section 8G.3, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 8. âTax exemption or creditâ means an exclusion from 26 the operation or collection of a tax imposed in this state. 27 Tax exemption or credit includes tax credits, exemptions, 28 deductions, and rebates. âTax exemption or creditâ also 29 includes sales tax refunds if such refunds are applied for and 30 granted as a form of financial assistance, including but not 31 limited to the refunds allowed in sections 15.331A 15.507 and 32 423.4 . 33 Sec. 28. Section 15.106B, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -23- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 23/ 79 H.F. 1054 b. Fees collected by the authority pursuant to this 1 subsection shall be deposited in a fund within the state 2 treasury created pursuant to section 15.106A, subsection 1 , 3 paragraph âoâ , and are appropriated to the authority for the 4 purposes set out in section 15.106A, subsection 1 , paragraph 5 âoâ . However, fees collected by the authority pursuant to 6 section 15.330, subsection 12, section 15E.198, Code 2014, Code 7 2025, and section 15.354, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ , shall be 8 used exclusively for costs associated with the administration 9 of due diligence and compliance. 10 Sec. 29. Section 15.293B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 3. If an investor is awarded a tax credit pursuant to this 13 section , the authority and the investor shall enter into an 14 agreement concerning the qualifying redevelopment project. If 15 the investor fails to comply with any of the requirements of 16 the agreement, the authority may find the investor in default 17 under the agreement and may revoke all or a portion of the tax 18 credit award. The department of revenue, upon notification by 19 the authority of an event of default, shall seek repayment of 20 the value of any such tax credit already claimed in the same 21 manner as provided in section 15.330, subsection 2. After 22 a final determination by the authority, the authority shall 23 notify the department of revenue of any required repayment or 24 recapture of a tax credit. The repayment or recapture of a 25 tax credit pursuant to this subsection shall be considered a 26 tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by 27 any taxpayer who has claimed the tax credit, and the failure 28 to make such a repayment may be treated by the department of 29 revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown 30 due or required to be shown due with the filing of a return or 31 deposit form. 32 Sec. 30. Section 15.317, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 5. The business shall not be relocating or reducing 35 -24- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 24/ 79 H.F. 1054 operations as described in section 15.329, subsection 1 , 1 paragraph âbâ follows , and as determined under the discretion 2 of the authority . : 3 a. The business shall not be solely relocating operations 4 from one area of the state. A project that does not create new 5 jobs or involve a substantial amount of new capital investment 6 shall be presumed to be a relocation. In determining whether a 7 business is solely relocating operations for purposes of this 8 paragraph, the authority shall consider a letter of support for 9 the move from the affected local community. 10 b. The business shall not be in the process of reducing 11 operations in one community while simultaneously applying for 12 the program. For purposes of this paragraph, a reduction in 13 operations within twelve months before or after an application 14 is submitted to the authority shall be presumed to be a 15 reduction in operations while simultaneously applying for 16 assistance under the program. 17 c. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit 18 a business from expanding its operation in a community if 19 existing operations of a similar nature in this state are not 20 closed or substantially reduced. 21 Sec. 31. Section 15.318, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. The compliance Compliance cost fees authorized in section 24 15.330, subsection 12 , shall apply to all agreements entered 25 into under this program and shall be collected by the authority 26 in the same manner and to the same extent as described in that 27 subsection. in the amount and manner as follows: 28 (1) The imposition of a one-time compliance cost fee of five 29 hundred dollars to be collected by the authority prior to the 30 issuance of a tax incentive certificate. 31 (2) The imposition of a compliance cost fee equal to 32 one-half of one percent of the value of tax incentives claimed 33 pursuant to an agreement that has an aggregate tax incentive 34 value of one hundred thousand dollars or greater. The 35 -25- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 25/ 79 H.F. 1054 authority shall collect the fee from the business after the 1 tax incentive is claimed by the business from the department 2 of revenue. 3 Sec. 32. Section 15.318, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 4. Termination and repayment. The failure by an eligible 6 business in fulfilling any requirement of the program or any of 7 the terms and obligations of an agreement entered into pursuant 8 to this section may result in the reduction, termination, or 9 rescission of the tax credits under section 15.319 and may 10 subject the eligible business to the repayment or recapture of 11 tax credits claimed. The repayment or recapture of tax credits 12 pursuant to this subsection shall be accomplished in the same 13 manner as provided in section 15.330, subsection 2. After 14 a final determination by the authority, the authority shall 15 notify the department of revenue of any required repayment or 16 recapture of a tax credit. The repayment or recapture of a 17 tax credit pursuant to this subsection shall be considered a 18 tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by 19 any taxpayer who has claimed the tax credit, and the failure 20 to make such a repayment may be treated by the department of 21 revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown 22 due or required to be shown due with the filing of a return or 23 deposit form. 24 Sec. 33. Section 15.354, subsection 1, paragraph b, 25 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 (2) A report that meets the requirements and conditions 27 of section 15.330, subsection 9 submitted to the authority 28 by a business together with its application describing all 29 violations of environmental law or worker safety law within 30 the last five years . If, upon review of the application, the 31 authority finds that the business has a record of violations 32 of the law, statutes, or rules that tends to show a consistent 33 pattern, the authority shall not provide incentives or 34 assistance to the business unless the authority finds either 35 -26- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 26/ 79 H.F. 1054 that the violations did not seriously affect public health, 1 public safety, or the environment, or, if such violations 2 did seriously affect public health, public safety, or the 3 environment, that mitigating circumstances were present. 4 Sec. 34. Section 15.354, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 c. In addition to complying with all applicable requirements 7 in paragraph âbâ , a housing business that chooses to be 8 considered as an applicant for tax credits reserved pursuant 9 to section 15.119, subsection 5 , for disaster recovery housing 10 projects shall also submit a certification that the applicantâs 11 housing project is located in a county that has been declared 12 a major disaster by the president of the United States on or 13 after March 12, 2019, and is also a county in which individuals 14 are eligible for federal individual assistance. The housing 15 business must also submit documentation that provides evidence 16 that the qualified housing project is needed due to impact of 17 the disaster that is the subject of the presidential major 18 disaster declaration. 19 Sec. 35. Section 15.354, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 20 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 b. The compliance Compliance cost fees imposed in section 22 15.330, subsection 12 , shall apply to all agreements entered 23 into under this program and shall be collected by the authority 24 in the same manner and to the same extent as described in that 25 subsection. in the amount and manner as follows: 26 (1) The imposition of a one-time compliance cost fee of five 27 hundred dollars to be collected by the authority prior to the 28 issuance of a tax incentive certificate. 29 (2) The imposition of a compliance cost fee equal to 30 one-half of one percent of the value of tax incentives 31 available pursuant to an agreement that has an aggregate tax 32 incentive value of one hundred thousand dollars or greater. 33 The authority shall collect the fee from the housing business 34 prior to the issuance of a tax incentive. 35 -27- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 27/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 36. Section 15.354, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 5. Termination and repayment. The failure by a housing 3 business in completing a housing project to comply with any 4 requirement of this program or any of the terms and obligations 5 of an agreement entered into pursuant to this section may 6 result in the revocation, reduction, termination, or rescission 7 of the tax incentive award or the approved tax incentives 8 and may subject the housing business to the repayment or 9 recapture of tax incentives claimed under section 15.355. The 10 repayment or recapture of tax incentives pursuant to this 11 section shall be accomplished in the same manner as provided 12 in section 15.330, subsection 2. After a final determination 13 by the authority, the authority shall notify the department of 14 revenue of any required repayment or recapture of a tax credit. 15 The repayment or recapture of a tax credit pursuant to this 16 subsection shall be considered a tax payment due and payable 17 to the department of revenue by any taxpayer who has claimed 18 the tax credit, and the failure to make such a repayment may 19 be treated by the department of revenue in the same manner as 20 a failure to pay the tax shown due or required to be shown due 21 with the filing of a return or deposit form. 22 Sec. 37. Section 15.355, subsection 2, paragraph b, 23 subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 (a) The housing business shall, after the agreement 26 completion date, make application to the department of revenue 27 for any refund of the amount of sales and use taxes paid under 28 chapter 423 prior to the completion of the housing project that 29 were directly related to a housing project and specified in the 30 agreement. The application shall be made in the manner and 31 upon forms to be provided by the department of revenue. The 32 department of revenue shall audit the claim and, if approved, 33 issue a warrant to the housing business. The application must 34 be made within one year after the agreement completion date. 35 -28- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 28/ 79 H.F. 1054 A claim filed by the housing business in accordance with this 1 subsection shall not be denied by reason of a time limitation 2 provision for filing a refund claim set forth in chapter 421 3 or 423 section 423.47 . 4 Sec. 38. Section 15.499, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. Except for the high quality jobs program administered 7 by the authority pursuant to sections 15.326 through 15.336 , 8 and the targeted jobs withholding credit pursuant to section 9 403.19A , an eligible business may apply for and be eligible to 10 receive other federal, state, and local incentives in addition 11 to the tax incentives issued by the authority to the eligible 12 business under the program. 13 Sec. 39. Section 15E.351, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 1. The authority shall establish and administer a business 16 accelerator program to provide financial assistance for 17 the establishment and operation of a business accelerator 18 for technology-based, value-added agricultural, information 19 solutions, alternative and renewable energy including the 20 alternative and renewable energy sectors listed in section 21 476.42, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), or 22 advanced manufacturing start-up businesses or for a satellite 23 of an existing business accelerator. The program shall be 24 designed to foster the accelerated growth of new and existing 25 businesses through the provision of technical assistance. The 26 authority may provide financial assistance under this section 27 from moneys allocated for financial assistance for business 28 accelerators pursuant to section 15.335B, subsection 2 15.111 . 29 Sec. 40. Section 15E.362, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 c. âFinancial assistanceâ means the same as defined in 32 section 15.327 assistance provided only from the funds, rights, 33 and assets legally available to the authority pursuant to 34 chapter 15 and includes but is not limited to assistance in the 35 -29- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 29/ 79 H.F. 1054 form of grants, loans, forgivable loans, and royalty payments . 1 Sec. 41. Section 15H.5, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. The Iowa summer youth corps program is established 4 to provide meaningful summer enrichment programming to Iowa 5 youth. The program shall be administered by the commission 6 using a competitive grant process to implement projects in 7 accordance with program requirements. The commission shall 8 adopt administrative rules for the program, including but not 9 limited to incentives, grant criteria, and grantee selection 10 processes. A percentage of the grants shall be designated by 11 the commission to address the needs of economically distressed 12 areas as defined in section 15.335C . 13 Sec. 42. Section 15H.5, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code 14 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 c. The commission shall give priority consideration to 16 approving those projects that target communities that have 17 disproportionately high rates of juvenile crime or low rates 18 of high school graduation or that have been designated as an 19 economically distressed areas as defined in section 15.335C 20 area . 21 Sec. 43. Section 15H.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 22 following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. For purposes of this section, 24 âeconomically distressed areaâ means a county that meets at 25 least three of the following criteria: 26 a. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 27 with the highest average monthly unemployment rates for the 28 most recent twelve-month period based on the applicable local 29 area unemployment statistics produced by the United States 30 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics. 31 b. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 32 with the highest average annualized unemployment rates for the 33 most recent five-year period based on the applicable local 34 area unemployment statistics produced by the United States 35 -30- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 30/ 79 H.F. 1054 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics. 1 c. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 2 with the lowest annual average weekly wages based on the most 3 recent quarterly census of employment and wages published 4 by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor 5 statistics. 6 d. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 7 with the highest family poverty rates based on the most recent 8 American community survey five-year estimate released by the 9 United States census bureau. 10 e. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 11 with the highest percentage population loss. Percentage 12 population loss shall be calculated by comparing the most 13 recent population estimate produced by the United States 14 census bureau to the most recent decennial census released 15 by the United States census bureau, except for a calendar 16 year in which the decennial census data is released, then the 17 percentage population loss shall be calculated by comparing the 18 population in the decennial census released that calendar year 19 to the population in the decennial census released ten years 20 prior. 21 f. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties 22 with the highest percentage of persons sixty-five years of age 23 or older based on the most recent American community survey 24 five-year estimate released by the United States census bureau. 25 Sec. 44. Section 159A.6B, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 2. The office may execute contracts in order to provide 28 technical support and outreach services for purposes of 29 assisting and educating interested persons as provided in this 30 section . The office may also contract with a consultant to 31 provide part or all of these services. The office may require 32 that a person receiving assistance pursuant to this section 33 contribute up to fifty percent of the amount required to 34 support the costs of contracting with the consultant to provide 35 -31- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 31/ 79 H.F. 1054 assistance to the person. The office shall assist the person 1 in completing any technical information required in order 2 to receive assistance by the economic development authority 3 pursuant to section 15.335B. 4 Sec. 45. Section 422.10, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 5 by striking the subsection. 6 Sec. 46. Section 422.11F, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the credits 9 allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by investment 10 tax credits authorized pursuant to section 15.333 and section 11 15E.193B, subsection 6, Code 2014 sections 15.508 and 15.496 . 12 Sec. 47. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code 13 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 48. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph b, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 17 by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to section 15.333 18 and section 15E.193B, subsection 6, Code 2014 sections 15.508 19 and 15.496 . 20 Sec. 49. Section 422.33, subsection 19, Code 2025, is 21 amended by striking the subsection. 22 Sec. 50. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 23 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 25 by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 26 15.333 and 15E.193B, subsection 6, Code 2014 15.508 and 15.496 . 27 Sec. 51. Section 422.60, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 28 by striking the subsection. 29 Sec. 52. Section 427B.17, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. Any electric power generating plant which operated during 32 the preceding assessment year at a net capacity factor of more 33 than twenty percent, shall not receive the benefits of this 34 section or of section 15.332 . 35 -32- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 32/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 53. Section 432.12C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by 3 investment tax credits authorized pursuant to section 15.333A 4 and section 15E.193B, subsection 6, Code 2014 sections 15.508 5 and 15.496 . 6 Sec. 54. Section 455B.104, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 7 amended by striking the subsection. 8 Sec. 55. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 9 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 10 Sec. 56. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 11 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 d. The moneys and credits tax imposed under this section 13 shall be reduced by an investment tax credit authorized 14 pursuant to section 15.333 sections 15.508 and 15.496 . 15 Sec. 57. REPEAL. Sections 15E.231, 15E.232, 15E.233, 16 266.19, 422.11U, and 432.12H, Code 2025, are repealed. 17 Sec. 58. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. The sections of 18 this division of this Act amending sections 422.10, 422.11F, 19 422.11U, 422.33, 422.60, 432.12C, 432.12H, and 533.329 shall 20 not limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect any amount of 21 tax incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before December 31, 22 2025, nor shall it limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect 23 a taxpayerâs right to claim or redeem a tax incentive issued, 24 awarded, or allowed before December 31, 2025, including but not 25 limited to any tax credit carryforward amount. 26 Sec. 59. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 27 effect December 31, 2025. 28 DIVISION VI 29 SEED INVESTOR TAX CREDIT PROGRAM AND INNOVATION FUND INVESTMENT 30 TAX CREDITS 31 Sec. 60. NEW SECTION . 15E.25 Purpose. 32 The purpose of this subchapter is to stimulate job growth, 33 create wealth, and accelerate the creation of new ventures by 34 using investment tax credits to incentivize the transfer of 35 -33- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 33/ 79 H.F. 1054 capital from investors to entrepreneurs, particularly during 1 early-stage growth. 2 Sec. 61. NEW SECTION . 15E.26 Definitions. 3 For purposes of this subchapter, unless the context 4 otherwise requires: 5 1. âAffiliateâ means a spouse, child, or sibling of an 6 investor or a corporation, partnership, or trust in which an 7 investor has a controlling equity interest or in which an 8 investor exercises management control. 9 2. âAuthorityâ means the economic development authority 10 created in section 15.105. 11 3. âEntrepreneurial assistance programâ includes the 12 entrepreneur investment awards program administered under 13 section 15E.362, the receipt of services from a service 14 provider engaged pursuant to section 15.411, subsection 1, or 15 the program administered under section 15.411, subsection 2. 16 4. âInvestmentâ means a minimum cash investment of ten 17 thousand dollars in a qualifying business. 18 5. âInvestorâ means a person making a cash investment in 19 a qualifying business. âInvestorâ does not include a person 20 that holds at least a seventy percent ownership interest as an 21 owner, member, or shareholder in a qualifying business. 22 6. âQualifying businessâ means a business meeting the 23 criteria defined in section 15E.28. 24 7. âRural areaâ means a city that has a population of 25 fifteen thousand or less based on the most recent decennial 26 census released by the United States census bureau. 27 8. âUrban areaâ means a city that has a population of 28 greater than fifteen thousand based on the most recent 29 decennial census released by the United States census bureau. 30 Sec. 62. NEW SECTION . 15E.27 Investment tax credits. 31 1. a. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 32 a tax credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed in 33 chapter 422, subchapters II, III, and V, and in chapter 432, 34 and against the moneys and credits tax imposed in section 35 -34- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 34/ 79 H.F. 1054 533.329, for a portion of a taxpayerâs equity investment, as 1 provided in subsection 2, in a qualifying business. 2 b. An individual may claim a tax credit under this section 3 of a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 4 estate, or trust electing to have income taxed directly to 5 the individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall 6 be based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings 7 from the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 8 estate, or trust. 9 c. A tax credit shall be allowed only for an investment 10 made in the form of cash to purchase equity in a qualifying 11 business. 12 d. An affiliate of a qualifying business or an affiliate of 13 a qualifying businessâs principals shall not be eligible for a 14 tax credit under this section. 15 e. (1) For a tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed 16 on any of the following, any tax credit in excess of the tax 17 liability is refundable: 18 (a) A tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed in 19 chapter 422, subchapters II, III, and V. 20 (b) A tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed in 21 chapter 432. 22 (c) A tax credit claimed against the moneys and credits tax 23 imposed in section 533.329. 24 (2) A tax credit shall not be carried back to a tax year 25 prior to the tax year in which the taxpayer redeems the tax 26 credit. 27 f. In lieu of claiming a refund, a taxpayer may elect to 28 have the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs final, completed 29 return credited to the tax liability for the immediately 30 succeeding tax year. 31 2. a. The amount of the tax credit shall equal twenty 32 percent of the taxpayerâs equity investment if the qualifying 33 business is located in an urban area at the time of the 34 investment. The amount of the tax credit shall equal 35 -35- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 35/ 79 H.F. 1054 thirty-five percent of the taxpayerâs equity investment if the 1 qualifying business is located in a rural area at the time of 2 the investment. 3 b. (1) The maximum amount of a tax credit that may be 4 issued per fiscal year to a natural person and the personâs 5 spouse or dependent shall not exceed one hundred thousand 6 dollars combined. For purposes of this subparagraph, 7 âdependentâ has the same meaning as defined by the Internal 8 Revenue Code. 9 (2) The maximum amount of a tax credit that may be issued 10 per fiscal year to a corporation or other entity shall not 11 exceed one hundred thousand dollars. 12 (3) An application received by the authority that exceeds 13 the maximum amount of tax credits permitted by this paragraph 14 shall be denied, in whole or in part, regardless of whether the 15 investment would otherwise be eligible to qualify for a tax 16 credit. 17 (4) For purposes of this paragraph, a tax credit issued 18 to a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 19 estate, or trust electing to have income taxed directly to 20 the individual shall be deemed to be issued to the individual 21 owners based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs 22 earnings from the entity. 23 c. The maximum amount of tax credits that may be issued 24 per fiscal year for equity investments in any one qualifying 25 business shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. An 26 application received by the authority that exceeds the maximum 27 amount of tax credits permitted by this paragraph shall 28 be denied, in whole or in part, regardless of whether the 29 investment would otherwise be eligible to qualify for a tax 30 credit. 31 3. An investment shall be deemed to have been made on the 32 same date as the date of acquisition of the equity interest as 33 determined by the Internal Revenue Code. 34 4. The authority shall not issue tax credits under this 35 -36- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 36/ 79 H.F. 1054 section in excess of the amount approved by the authority for 1 any one fiscal year pursuant to section 15.119, subsection 2, 2 paragraph âaâ . 3 5. A tax credit shall not be transferred to any other 4 person. 5 6. The authority shall develop a system for registration and 6 issuance of tax credits authorized pursuant to this subchapter 7 and shall control distribution of all tax credit certificates 8 to investors pursuant to this subchapter. The authority 9 shall develop rules for the qualification and administration 10 of qualifying businesses. The department of revenue shall 11 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A as necessary for the 12 administration of this subchapter. 13 Sec. 63. NEW SECTION . 15E.28 Qualifying businesses. 14 1. To determine whether a business is a qualifying business, 15 a business shall submit an application to the authority that 16 is accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee. A business 17 must be certified by the authority as a qualifying business in 18 order for an investorâs equity investment to qualify for a tax 19 credit. 20 2. In order to be a qualifying business, a business must 21 meet all of the following criteria: 22 a. The principal business operations, and a majority of 23 employees, of the business are located in this state. 24 b. The business has been in operation for five years or 25 less. 26 c. The business has at least one full-time equivalent 27 employee. 28 d. The businessâs primary operations are in advanced 29 manufacturing, bioscience, insurance and finance, and 30 technologies. The business shall not be primarily engaged in 31 retail sales, real estate, the provision of health care, or 32 the provision of services that require a professional license. 33 In determining whether a business is primarily engaged in 34 advanced manufacturing, biosciences, insurance and finance, or 35 -37- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 37/ 79 H.F. 1054 technologies, the authority shall consider the businessâs North 1 American industry classification system code, the businessâs 2 main sources of revenue, and the businessâs customer base. 3 e. The business is an independent organization that is 4 not part of, or an affiliate of, a business that is not a 5 qualifying business. 6 f. The business shall establish that its owners, directors, 7 officers, and employees have an appropriate level of experience 8 consistent with the nature of the business. The authority may 9 consult with outside service providers to determine whether a 10 business meets the requirement of this paragraph. A business 11 that has participated in an entrepreneurial assistance program 12 shall be presumed to meet the requirement of this paragraph. 13 g. The business shall not have a net worth that exceeds ten 14 million dollars. 15 h. The business shall have secured all of the following at 16 the time of application for tax credits: 17 (1) At least two investors. For purposes of this 18 subparagraph, âinvestorâ includes a person who executes a 19 binding investment commitment to a qualifying business, and 20 does not include an affiliate of a qualifying business or an 21 affiliate of a qualifying businessâs principals. 22 (2) Total equity financing, binding investment commitments, 23 or some combination thereof, equal to at least five hundred 24 thousand dollars, from investors. 25 3. A qualifying business shall have the burden of proof 26 to demonstrate to the authority its qualifications under this 27 section, and shall have the obligation to notify the authority 28 in a timely manner of any changes in the qualifications of 29 the business or in the eligibility of investors to redeem the 30 investment tax credits in any tax year. The authority may 31 revoke the certification of a qualifying business that no 32 longer meets the requirements of this section. 33 4. A business that has been certified by the authority as a 34 qualifying business shall annually submit an application to the 35 -38- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 38/ 79 H.F. 1054 authority that documents continued eligibility as a qualifying 1 business and any investments that may qualify for a tax credit. 2 The business shall submit the application to the authority 3 during an annual application period designated by the authority 4 by rule. 5 5. Based on the applications submitted by qualifying 6 businesses pursuant to subsection 4, the authority shall make 7 an initial allocation of tax credits in the order in which 8 the applications are received until the maximum amount of tax 9 credits determined by the board pursuant to section 15.119, 10 subsection 2, is reached. Equity investors that are eligible 11 for a tax credit based on such initial allocation shall submit 12 any additional information requested by the authority necessary 13 to verify the eligibility of the investor and to issue a tax 14 credit certificate. An equity investor that does not submit 15 the required information may be denied a tax credit. If any 16 equity investor included in the initial allocation is denied 17 a tax credit, the authority may allocate such tax credits 18 to equity investors that were not included in the initial 19 allocation. 20 6. Upon receipt of all required information from a 21 qualifying business and an equity investor, the director of 22 the authority may approve issuance of a tax credit certificate 23 to be included with the equity investorâs tax return. The tax 24 credit certificate shall contain the taxpayerâs name, address, 25 tax identification number, the amount of tax credit, the name 26 of the qualifying business, and any other information required 27 by the department of revenue. The tax credit certificate, 28 unless rescinded by the authority, shall be accepted by the 29 department of revenue as payment for taxes imposed pursuant 30 to chapter 422, subchapters II, III, and V, and in chapter 31 432, and for the moneys and credits tax imposed in section 32 533.329, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by 33 the authority upon the face of the tax credit certificate and 34 subject to the limitations of section 15E.27. 35 -39- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 39/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 64. NEW SECTION . 15E.29 Confidentiality ââ reports. 1 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, all information or 2 records in the possession of the authority with respect to this 3 subchapter shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade 4 secret protected under chapter 550 or common law, and shall be 5 kept confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by 6 a court. 7 2. All of the following shall be considered public 8 information under chapter 22: 9 a. The identity of a qualifying business. 10 b. The identity of an investor and the qualifying business 11 in which the investor made an equity investment. 12 c. The number of tax credit certificates issued by the 13 authority. 14 d. The total dollar amount of tax credits issued by the 15 authority. 16 3. The authority shall include as part of the annual 17 report under section 15.107B a listing of eligible qualifying 18 businesses, the number of tax credit certificates, and the 19 amount of tax credits issued by the authority in each fiscal 20 year. 21 Sec. 65. Section 15E.52, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 a. To receive a tax credit, a taxpayer must submit an 24 application to the board. The board shall issue certificates 25 under this section on a first-come, first-served basis, which 26 certificates may be redeemed for tax credits. The board shall 27 issue such certificates so that not more than the amount 28 allocated for such tax credits under section 15.119, subsection 29 2, paragraph âaâ , may be claimed. The board shall not issue a 30 certificate before September 1, 2014. 31 Sec. 66. Section 15E.52, subsection 7, paragraph g, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 g. The fund proposes to obtain at least fifteen three 34 million dollars in binding investment commitments and to invest 35 -40- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 40/ 79 H.F. 1054 a minimum of fifteen three million dollars in companies that 1 have a principal place of business in the state. 2 Sec. 67. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed 3 to do the following: 4 1. Entitle chapter 15E, subchapter IV, âSeed Investor Tax 5 Creditâ and include sections 15E.25 through 15E.29. 6 2. Correct internal references in the Code and in enacted 7 legislation as necessary due to the enactment of this division 8 of this Act. 9 DIVISION VII 10 ELIMINATION OF INVESTMENTS IN QUALIFYING BUSINESSES TAX CREDIT 11 PROGRAM 12 Sec. 68. REPEAL. Sections 15E.41, 15E.42, 15E.43, 15E.44, 13 and 15E.46, Code 2025, are repealed. 14 Sec. 69. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. A tax credit issued by the 15 economic development authority to a taxpayer before June 30, 16 2026, for an investment in a qualifying business pursuant to 17 chapter 15E, subchapter V, Code 2025, shall remain valid per 18 the terms under which the tax credit was issued by the economic 19 development authority, and the provisions of chapter 15E, 20 subchapter V, Code 2025. 21 DIVISION VIII 22 INVESTMENTS IN QUALIFYING BUSINESS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM ââ 23 CONFORMING CHANGES 24 Sec. 70. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph d, 25 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 26 subparagraph. 27 Sec. 71. Section 15E.52, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 4. A taxpayer shall not claim a tax credit under this 30 section if the taxpayer is a venture capital investment fund 31 allocation manager for the Iowa fund of funds created in 32 section 15E.65 or an investor that receives a tax credit for 33 the same investment in a qualifying business as described in 34 section 15E.44 or in a community-based seed capital fund as 35 -41- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 41/ 79 H.F. 1054 described in section 15E.45 , Code 2015 15E.28 . 1 Sec. 72. Section 422.11F, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the credits 4 allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by an investment 5 tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.43 15E.27 for an 6 investment in a qualifying business. 7 Sec. 73. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph a, Code 8 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 10 by an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section 11 15E.43 15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business. 12 Sec. 74. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 15 by an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section 16 15E.43 15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business. 17 Sec. 75. Section 432.12C, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 1. The tax imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by 20 an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.43 21 15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business. 22 Sec. 76. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 23 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 e. The moneys and credits tax imposed under this section 25 shall be reduced by an investment tax credit authorized 26 pursuant to section 15E.43 15E.27 . 27 Sec. 77. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. The sections of 28 this division of this Act amending sections 422.11F, 422.33, 29 422.60, 432.12C, and 533.329 shall not limit, modify, or 30 otherwise adversely affect any amount of investment tax credit 31 under section 15E.43, Code 2025, that was issued, awarded, 32 or allowed before July 1, 2026, and shall not limit, modify, 33 or otherwise adversely affect a taxpayerâs right to claim or 34 redeem an investment tax credit under section 15E.43, Code 35 -42- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 42/ 79 H.F. 1054 2025, that was issued, awarded, or allowed before July 1, 1 2026, including but not limited to any tax credit carryforward 2 amount. 3 DIVISION IX 4 IOWA FILM PRODUCTION INCENTIVE PROGRAM AND FUND 5 Sec. 78. NEW SECTION . 15.517 Iowa film production incentive 6 program. 7 1. As used in this section: 8 a. âFundâ means the Iowa film production incentive fund. 9 b. âProgramâ means the Iowa film production incentive 10 program. 11 c. âQualified expenditureâ means an allowed expense, as 12 determined by the authority by rule, that is incurred by a 13 qualified production facility on or after July 1, 2025, but 14 before July 1, 2027, for producing a qualified production. 15 d. âQualified productionâ means a feature film, television 16 series, documentary, or unscripted series that is rated G, PG, 17 PG-13, or R by the classification and ratings administration of 18 the motion picture association of America or the TV parental 19 guidelines monitoring board. 20 e. âQualified production facilityâ or âfacilityâ means any 21 of the following: 22 (1) A dedicated studio located in this state at which 23 qualified productions can be produced. 24 (2) A studio located in this state at which all 25 preproduction and film production take place for a qualified 26 production filmed on location in this state. 27 (3) A company that has, in the three consecutive years 28 immediately preceding an application for a rebate, had the 29 companyâs principal place of business in this state and 30 produced a qualified production. 31 2. a. The authority shall establish and administer an Iowa 32 film production incentive program for the purpose of providing 33 rebates to qualified production facilities for qualified 34 expenditures. 35 -43- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 43/ 79 H.F. 1054 b. The authority shall establish eligibility criteria for 1 the program by rule. 2 (1) The eligibility criteria for qualified production 3 facilities must require that a facility have an agreement 4 between the authority and the facility that the phrase âfilmed 5 in Iowaâ appears noticeably in the credits of the qualified 6 production. 7 (2) The eligibility criteria for a qualified production 8 must include: 9 (a) A total production budget of at least one million 10 dollars, including at least five hundred thousand dollars in 11 qualified expenditures, and evidence that the total production 12 budget is fully funded. 13 (b) Availability to the public for viewing at a venue where 14 admission is charged, or availability for purchase, for rental, 15 or through a streaming service that requires a subscription. 16 (3) The eligibility criteria for qualified expenditures 17 must include the following: 18 (a) The requirements for substantiation of expenses 19 and submission of expenses for industry standard activities 20 including expenses for cast members, equipment, studio 21 production facilities, hospitality services, certified public 22 accountant services, per diem payments, payments to businesses 23 located in this state, accommodations, and any other expenses 24 allowed by the authority. Qualified expenditures shall not 25 include expenses for entertainment, studio executive airfare, 26 royalties, and publicity for the qualified production. 27 (b) Documentation that all qualified expenses were incurred 28 following approval of the application for rebate by the 29 authority. 30 3. An application for a rebate under the program shall 31 be submitted by a qualified production facility to the 32 authority for approval in the form and manner prescribed by the 33 authority. In determining whether to approve a rebate, the 34 factors the authority may consider include but are not limited 35 -44- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 44/ 79 H.F. 1054 to all of the following: 1 a. The extent to which the applicant will participate 2 in training, education, and recruitment programs that are 3 organized in cooperation with interested Iowa colleges and 4 universities, and that are designed to promote and encourage 5 the training and hiring of Iowa residents. 6 b. Whether the rebate will incentivize a qualified 7 production facility to choose an Iowa location for its 8 qualified production rather than an out-of-state location. 9 c. The likelihood that approval of the rebate will result in 10 an overall long-term positive impact to the state. 11 4. a. If a qualified production facilityâs application 12 is approved by the authority, the maximum rebate paid to the 13 facility under the program shall equal thirty percent of the 14 facilityâs documented qualified expenditures excluding any 15 sales, use, and hotel and motel taxes paid. 16 b. Prior to disbursement of the rebate, a qualified 17 production facility shall submit all of the following to the 18 authority at the expense of the facility: 19 (1) An examination of the qualified expenditures completed 20 by a certified public accountant, as defined in section 21 542.3, in accordance with the currently effective statements 22 on standards for attestation engagements established by the 23 American institute of certified public accountants. 24 (2) A statement of the final amount of qualified 25 expenditures. 26 (3) Any other information the authority deems necessary to 27 ensure compliance with this section. 28 5. a. An Iowa film production incentive fund is created 29 in the state treasury under the control of the authority. The 30 fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the authority and 31 any other moneys available to, obtained by, or accepted by the 32 authority for placement in the fund. The fund shall be used to 33 provide rebates under the program. 34 b. The cumulative value of rebates claimed by qualified 35 -45- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 45/ 79 H.F. 1054 production facilities pursuant to this section shall not exceed 1 ten million dollars. 2 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 3 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the 4 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 5 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 6 the succeeding fiscal year. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 7 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 8 to the fund. 9 6. The authority shall not use more than five percent of 10 the moneys in the fund at the beginning of each fiscal year for 11 purposes of administrative costs, technical assistance, and 12 other program support. 13 7. The authority shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 14 to administer this section. 15 8. This section is repealed July 1, 2027. 16 Sec. 79. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 17 designate section 15.517, as enacted in this division of this 18 Act, as part 34 of subchapter II. 19 DIVISION X 20 EMPLOYER CHILD CARE TAX CREDIT REPEAL 21 Sec. 80. Section 237A.31, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 1. The taxes imposed under chapter 422, subchapter II or 24 III , the franchise tax imposed under chapter 422, subchapter 25 V , the gross premiums tax under chapter 432 , or the moneys and 26 credits tax imposed under section 533.329 shall be reduced 27 by an employer child care tax credit through the tax year 28 beginning on or after January 1, 2025, but before January 1, 29 2026, equal to the proportion of the federal employer-provided 30 child care tax credit provided in section 45F of the Internal 31 Revenue Code the taxpayer was eligible for in the same tax year 32 attributable to expenditures made in this state. 33 Sec. 81. Section 237A.31, Code 2025, is amended by adding 34 the following new subsection: 35 -46- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 46/ 79 H.F. 1054 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. This section is repealed January 1, 1 2031. 2 Sec. 82. Section 422.12O, Code 2025, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. This section is repealed January 1, 5 2031. 6 Sec. 83. Section 422.33, subsection 32, Code 2025, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 32. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be 9 reduced by an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant 10 to section 237A.31 . 11 b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031. 12 Sec. 84. Section 422.60, subsection 15, Code 2025, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 15. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be 15 reduced by an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant 16 to section 237A.31 . 17 b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031. 18 Sec. 85. Section 432.12O, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 432.12O Employer child care tax credit. 21 1. The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by 22 an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant to section 23 237A.31 . 24 2. This section is repealed January 1, 2031. 25 Sec. 86. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph m, Code 26 2025, is amended to read as follows: 27 m. (1) The moneys and credits tax imposed under this 28 section shall be reduced by an employer child care tax credit 29 allowed pursuant to section 237A.31 . 30 (2) This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2031. 31 DIVISION XI 32 ASSISTIVE DEVICE TAX CREDIT REPEAL 33 Sec. 87. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph e, 34 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -47- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 47/ 79 H.F. 1054 (5) (a) The assistive device corporate tax credit under 1 section 422.33 . 2 (b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2031. 3 Sec. 88. Section 422.33, subsection 9, paragraph a, 4 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 (1) The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be 6 reduced by an assistive device tax credit through the tax year 7 beginning on or after January 1, 2024, but before January 1, 8 2025 . A small business purchasing, renting, or modifying 9 an assistive device or making workplace modifications for 10 an individual with a disability who is employed or will 11 be employed by the small business is eligible, subject to 12 availability of credits, to receive this assistive device 13 tax credit which is equal to fifty percent of the first five 14 thousand dollars paid during the tax year for the purchase, 15 rental, or modification of the assistive device or for making 16 the workplace modifications. The following percentage of any 17 credit in excess of the tax liability shall be refunded with 18 interest in accordance with section 421.60, subsection 2 , 19 paragraph âeâ , as follows: 20 (a) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, 21 but before January 1, 2024, ninety-five percent. 22 (b) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, 23 but before January 1, 2025, ninety percent. 24 (c) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, 25 but before January 1, 2026, eighty-five percent. 26 (d) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, 27 but before January 1, 2027, eighty percent. 28 (e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, 29 seventy-five percent. 30 Sec. 89. Section 422.33, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 31 by adding the following new paragraph: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. This subsection is repealed January 1, 33 2031. 34 Sec. 90. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 35 -48- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 48/ 79 H.F. 1054 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years 1 beginning on or after that date. 2 DIVISION XII 3 ENDOW IOWA TAX CREDIT 4 Sec. 91. Section 15E.303, subsections 1, 2, and 6, Code 5 2025, are amended by striking the subsections. 6 Sec. 92. Section 15E.305, subsection 2, unnumbered 7 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 The aggregate amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to 9 this section shall not exceed a total of six three million five 10 hundred thousand dollars annually. 11 Sec. 93. Section 15E.305, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. The maximum amount of tax credits granted to a taxpayer 14 shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars. 15 Sec. 94. Section 15E.305, Code 2025, is amended by adding 16 the following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. In addition to the other eligibility 18 requirements for receiving a tax credit under this section, to 19 be eligible to receive a tax credit pursuant to this section 20 all of the following must apply: 21 a. The endow Iowa qualified community foundation and 22 permanent endowment fund do not contain the name of a 23 corporation or other business entity. 24 b. The endow Iowa qualified community foundation submitted 25 a report to the general assembly by January 31 detailing the 26 specific grants provided during the calendar year preceding the 27 applicable tax year. 28 c. The community foundation that administers a permanent 29 endowment fund for which a taxpayer requests a tax credit has 30 provided any information requested by the authority to verify 31 whether a contribution to the permanent endowment fund is 32 eligible for the tax credit. 33 Sec. 95. Section 15E.311, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -49- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 49/ 79 H.F. 1054 c. âEligible county recipientâ means an endow Iowa qualified 1 community foundation or community affiliate organization, as 2 defined in section 15E.303 , that is selected , in accordance 3 with the procedures described in section 15E.304 , to receive 4 moneys from an account created in this section for a particular 5 county. To be selected as an eligible county recipient, a 6 community affiliate organization shall establish a county 7 affiliate fund to receive moneys as provided by this section . 8 Sec. 96. Section 15E.311, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 9 amended by striking the subsection. 10 Sec. 97. REPEAL. Sections 15E.301, 15E.302, and 15E.304, 11 Code 2025, are repealed. 12 Sec. 98. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 13 effect January 1, 2026. 14 Sec. 99. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 15 to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 16 DIVISION XIII 17 RESEARCH ACTIVITIES TAX CREDIT REPEAL 18 Sec. 100. Section 422.10, subsection 1, unnumbered 19 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by 21 a state tax credit for increasing research activities in this 22 state through the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 23 2025, but before January 1, 2026 . 24 Sec. 101. Section 422.10, subsection 1, paragraph b, 25 subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (d), subparagraph 26 subdivision (iv), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 27 subparagraph subdivision. 28 Sec. 102. Section 422.10, subsection 1, paragraph b, 29 subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (e), Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 (e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 32 2027 2026 , amounts paid for supplies as defined in section 33 41(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be qualified 34 research expenses in this state. 35 -50- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 50/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 103. Section 422.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. This section is repealed January 1, 3 2027. 4 Sec. 104. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph a, 5 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by 8 a state tax credit through the tax year beginning on or after 9 January 1, 2025, but before January 1, 2026, for increasing 10 research activities in this state equal to the sum of the 11 following: 12 Sec. 105. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph b, 13 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (d), subparagraph 14 subdivision (iv), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 15 subparagraph subdivision. 16 Sec. 106. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph b, 17 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (e), Code 2025, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 (e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 20 2027 2026 , amounts paid for supplies as defined in section 21 41(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be qualified 22 research expenses in this state. 23 Sec. 107. Section 422.33, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 24 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 25 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. This subsection is repealed January 1, 26 2027. 27 DIVISION XIV 28 RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT TAX CREDIT PROGRAM 29 Sec. 108. NEW SECTION . 15.520 Short title. 30 This part shall be known and may be cited as the âResearch 31 and Development Tax Credit Programâ . 32 Sec. 109. NEW SECTION . 15.521 Definitions. 33 As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: 34 1. âEligible expendituresâ means qualified research expenses 35 -51- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 51/ 79 H.F. 1054 under section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent 1 the expenditures occurred in this state. 2 2. âQualified businessâ means a business certified by the 3 authority as eligible to claim the research and development tax 4 credit. 5 3. âQualified research and developmentâ means a systematic 6 activity that combines basic and applied research in an attempt 7 to discover solutions to new or existing problems, or to 8 create or update goods and services. âQualified research and 9 developmentâ includes a set of innovative activities undertaken 10 by an eligible business in developing new services or products, 11 and in improving existing ones. 12 Sec. 110. NEW SECTION . 15.522 Eligible businesses and 13 sectors. 14 1. The tax credit available pursuant to this part shall be 15 available only to a business primarily engaged in any of the 16 following: 17 a. Advanced manufacturing. 18 b. Bioscience. 19 c. Insurance and finance. 20 d. Technology and innovation. 21 2. For a business described in subsection 1, the sectors 22 available for the credit may include the following: 23 a. Second-generation food innovation. 24 b. Food ingredients and supplements. 25 c. Crop protection. 26 d. Hybrid seed technologies. 27 e. Diagnostic analytics and immunotherapies. 28 f. Chip technologies and microelectronics. 29 g. Medical equipment and supplies. 30 h. Software and technology. 31 i. Aerospace. 32 j. Pharmaceuticals. 33 k. Consumer products. 34 l. Any additional sectors included by the authority by rule. 35 -52- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 52/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 111. NEW SECTION . 15.523 Application, certification, 1 and agreement. 2 1. A business shall submit a preapplication to the authority 3 to determine whether the business is primarily engaged 4 in an eligible sector identified in section 15.522 and is 5 actively engaged in qualified research and development. The 6 determination made by the authority shall be based on factors 7 including but not limited to the North American industry 8 classification code and sources of revenue. The authority may 9 request any additional documentation or conduct site visits 10 to verify the requirements of the program are met upon the 11 submission of the preapplication. 12 2. The authority must certify a business as a qualified 13 business for the business to claim a research and development 14 tax credit. A qualified business that continues to meet the 15 requirements of the program and the agreement entered pursuant 16 to subsection 3 may remain certified for up to five years. A 17 business may reapply for certification in additional five-year 18 increments. A business that does not demonstrate an increase 19 in eligible expenditures may be denied recertification by 20 the authority. A business that is denied certification or 21 recertification may reapply. The authority may specify the 22 length of time after the denial when the business is eligible 23 to reapply. 24 3. An eligible business must enter into an agreement with 25 the authority for successful completion of all requirements of 26 the program. 27 4. Each year after certification as a qualified business, 28 the qualified business shall submit an application to the 29 authority for a tax credit based on the amount of eligible 30 expenditures that were included in Section F of Internal 31 Revenue Form 6765 that was submitted with the qualified 32 businessâs most recently filed and accepted federal tax return. 33 The application shall include a verification of eligible 34 expenditures by procedures prescribed by the authority by rule. 35 -53- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 53/ 79 H.F. 1054 The qualified business shall engage an independent certified 1 public accountant authorized to practice in this state to 2 conduct the verification. A qualified business shall submit 3 the application to the authority by January 31 following the 4 most recently filed and accepted federal tax return for a tax 5 year in which the business is determined to be a qualified 6 business. 7 5. Each fiscal year, the authority will approve tax credit 8 awards by apportioning the amount of tax credits available 9 pursuant to section 15.119 on a pro rata basis, based on 10 the total amount of eligible expenditures incurred by all 11 qualified businesses that are awarded a tax credit. Up to 12 five percent of the amount of tax credits available pursuant 13 to section 15.119 may be awarded as additional tax credits to 14 qualified businesses that demonstrate an increase in eligible 15 expenditures. 16 6. If the qualified business fails to comply with any 17 requirements of the program or the agreement entered pursuant 18 to subsection 3 as determined by the authority, the qualified 19 business may have its certification as a qualified business 20 revoked or be required to repay any tax credit the authority 21 issued to the qualified business. After a final determination, 22 the authority will notify the department of revenue of any 23 required repayment of a tax credit. Such repayment shall be 24 considered a tax payment due and payable to the department of 25 revenue by any taxpayer that claimed the tax incentive, and the 26 failure to make the repayment may be treated by the department 27 of revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown 28 due, or required to be shown due, with the filing of a return or 29 deposit form. 30 7. A qualified business that claims a research activities 31 credit pursuant to section 422.10 or 422.33, Code 2025, 32 shall not claim a research and development tax credit awarded 33 pursuant to this part on the same tax return. 34 Sec. 112. NEW SECTION . 15.524 Research and development tax 35 -54- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 54/ 79 H.F. 1054 credit. 1 1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a 2 research and development tax credit is available to a qualified 3 business that is approved for the tax credit by the authority. 4 2. Upon submission of the documentation required pursuant 5 to section 15.523, subsection 4, and verification of eligible 6 expenditures by the authority, the authority may issue a tax 7 credit certificate to a qualified business indicating the 8 amount available to be claimed. The authority may approve a 9 tax credit in an amount up to three and one-half percent of 10 the amount of the qualified businessâs eligible expenditures. 11 The tax credit shall be claimed in the tax year immediately 12 following the tax year during which the eligible expenditures 13 were incurred. 14 3. To claim a tax credit under this section, a taxpayer 15 shall include one or more tax credit certificates with the 16 taxpayerâs tax return. The tax credit certificate must contain 17 the taxpayerâs name, address, tax identification number, the 18 amount of the credit, the name of the qualified business, and 19 any other information required by the department of revenue. 20 The tax credit certificate, unless rescinded by the authority, 21 shall be accepted by the department of revenue as payment for 22 taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 422, subchapters II and 23 III, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by the 24 authority upon the face of the tax credit certificate and 25 subject to the limitations of the program. 26 4. Any tax credit in excess of the businessâs tax liability 27 is refundable. In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer 28 may elect to have the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs 29 final, completed return credited to the tax liability for the 30 following tax year. 31 5. Tax credit certificates issued pursuant to this section 32 are not transferable. 33 6. If the business is a partnership, S corporation, limited 34 liability company, estate, or trust electing to have the income 35 -55- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 55/ 79 H.F. 1054 taxed directly to the individual, an individual may claim the 1 tax credit allowed. The amount claimed by the individual shall 2 be based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings 3 of the partnership, S corporation, limited liability company, 4 or estate or trust. 5 7. The maximum amount of tax credits the authority may issue 6 under this section each fiscal year shall not exceed the amount 7 specified in section 15.119. 8 8. A qualified business that was approved to receive a 9 research activities credit pursuant to section 15.335, Code 10 2025, prior to January 1, 2026, shall not claim such tax credit 11 and a research and development tax credit pursuant to this part 12 on the same tax return. 13 Sec. 113. NEW SECTION . 15.525 Reporting requirements. 14 1. A qualified business shall report annually to the 15 authority all of the following: 16 a. The total amount of investment made in research and 17 development. 18 b. The qualified location in this state where the research 19 and development occurred. 20 c. The number of jobs created, wages paid, and employee 21 residence locations. 22 2. The authority shall include as part of the annual report 23 under section 15.107B an annual report of the activities 24 conducted pursuant to this part. 25 3. The authority shall report all information in an 26 aggregate form to prevent, as much as possible, information 27 being attributable to any particular qualified business. 28 Sec. 114. NEW SECTION . 15.526 Confidentiality. 29 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, all information or 30 records in the possession of the authority with respect to this 31 part shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade secret 32 protected under chapter 550 or common law, and shall be kept 33 confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by the 34 court. 35 -56- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 56/ 79 H.F. 1054 2. The identity of a tax credit recipient and the amount 1 of the tax credit shall be considered public information under 2 chapter 22. 3 Sec. 115. NEW SECTION . 422.12Q Research and development 4 tax credit. 5 The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 6 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a research 7 and development tax credit allowed pursuant to section 15.524. 8 Sec. 116. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding 9 the following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 17. The taxes imposed under this subchapter 11 shall be reduced by the research and development tax credit 12 allowed pursuant to section 15.524. 13 Sec. 117. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 14 designate sections 15.520 through 15.526, as enacted in this 15 division of this Act, as part 35 of subchapter II. 16 Sec. 118. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 17 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18 DIVISION XV 19 SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL PRODUCTION TAX CREDIT 20 Sec. 119. NEW SECTION . 15.530 Short title. 21 This part shall be known and may be cited as the âSustainable 22 Aviation Fuel Production Tax Credit Programâ . 23 Sec. 120. NEW SECTION . 15.531 Definitions. 24 As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: 25 1. âAviation gasolineâ means the same as defined in section 26 452A.2. 27 2. âEligible taxpayerâ means a business engaged in 28 manufacturing sustainable aviation fuel from feedstock. 29 3. âFeedstockâ means any organic matter processed or refined 30 in the state suitable for sustainable aviation fuel production 31 without further enhancement. âFeedstockâ includes ethanol, corn 32 oil, soybean oil, animal fats, used cooking oil, and algae. 33 4. âJet fuelâ means blends of hydrocarbons derived from 34 crude petroleum, natural gasoline, and synthetic hydrocarbons, 35 -57- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 57/ 79 H.F. 1054 intended for use in aviation turbine engines, and that meet 1 the specifications in ASTM (American society for testing and 2 materials) specification D1655-12. 3 5. âSustainable aviation fuelâ means the portion of a liquid 4 fuel meeting the requirements of ASTM D7566 or the Fischer 5 Tropsch provisions of ASTM D1655, Annex A1, derived from 6 feedstock not including palm fatty acid distillates and that 7 achieves at least a fifty percent life cycle greenhouse gas 8 emissions reduction as determined by any of the following: 9 a. The fuel production pathway achieves at least a fifty 10 percent life cycle greenhouse gas emission reduction in 11 comparison with petroleum-based aviation gasoline, aviation 12 turbine fuel, and jet fuel utilizing the most recent version 13 of the GREET (Argonne national laboratoryâs greenhouse gases, 14 regulated emissions, and energy use in technologies) model that 15 accounts for reduced emissions throughout the fuel production 16 process. 17 b. The fuel production pathway achieves at least a fifty 18 percent reduction in comparison with petroleum-based aviation 19 gasoline, aviation turbine fuel, and jet fuel utilizing the 20 most recent version of the default life cycle emission value or 21 actual core life cycle emissions value under the most recent 22 carbon offsetting and reduction scheme for international 23 aviation methodology for sustainable aviation fuels adopted by 24 the international civil aviation organization. 25 Sec. 121. NEW SECTION . 15.532 Eligible business application 26 and agreement. 27 1. a. An eligible business that produces a sustainable 28 aviation fuel in this state from feedstock during a calendar 29 year may apply to the authority for the sustainable aviation 30 fuel tax credit provided in section 15.533. 31 b. The application must be made to the authority in the 32 manner prescribed by the authority. 33 c. The application must be made during the calendar year 34 following the calendar year in which the sustainable aviation 35 -58- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 58/ 79 H.F. 1054 fuel is produced. 1 d. The authority may accept applications on a continuous 2 basis or may establish, by rule, an annual application 3 deadline. 4 e. The application must include all of the following 5 information: 6 (1) The amount of sustainable aviation fuel produced in 7 the state from feedstock by the eligible business during the 8 calendar year, measured in gallons. 9 (2) The types and sources of feedstock used to produce 10 sustainable aviation fuel, documented in sufficient detail to 11 allow the authority to verify that such feedstock was processed 12 or refined in the state. 13 (3) Any other information reasonably required by the 14 authority in order to establish and verify eligibility under 15 the program. 16 f. The authority shall review and score all complete 17 applications submitted by eligible businesses on a competitive 18 basis pursuant to rules adopted by the authority. 19 2. a. Before being issued a tax credit under section 20 15.533, an eligible business must enter into an agreement with 21 the authority for the successful completion of all requirements 22 of the program. As part of the agreement, the eligible 23 business shall agree to collect and provide any information 24 reasonably required by the authority in order to allow the 25 board to fulfill its reporting obligation under section 15.534. 26 b. An eligible business shall fulfill all the requirements 27 of the program and the agreement before the authority issues 28 the business a tax credit certificate or enters into a 29 subsequent agreement with the business under this section. The 30 authority may decline to enter into a subsequent agreement with 31 the business under this section if a prior agreement is not 32 successfully fulfilled. 33 c. Upon establishing that all requirements of the program 34 and the agreement have been fulfilled, the authority shall 35 -59- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 59/ 79 H.F. 1054 issue a tax credit certificate to the eligible business stating 1 the amount of sustainable fuel tax credit the eligible business 2 may claim. 3 3. The failure by an eligible business in fulfilling any 4 requirement of the program or any of the terms and obligations 5 of an agreement entered into pursuant to this section may 6 result in the reduction, termination, or rescission of the 7 tax credits under section 15.533 and may subject the eligible 8 business to the repayment or recapture of tax credits claimed. 9 After a final determination, the authority will notify the 10 department of revenue of any required repayment of a tax 11 credit. Such repayment shall be considered a tax payment due 12 and payable to the department of revenue by any taxpayer that 13 claimed the tax credit, and the failure to make the repayment 14 may be treated by the department of revenue in the same manner 15 as a failure to pay the tax shown due, or required to be shown 16 due, with the filing of a return or deposit form. 17 4. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , any information 18 or record in the possession of the authority with respect to 19 the program shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade 20 secret protected under chapter 550 or common law and shall be 21 kept confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by 22 a court. 23 b. The identity of a tax credit recipient and the amount 24 of the tax credit shall be considered public information under 25 chapter 22. 26 Sec. 122. NEW SECTION . 15.533 Sustainable aviation fuel 27 tax credit. 28 1. An eligible business that has entered into an agreement 29 pursuant to section 15.532 may claim a tax credit in an amount 30 equal to the product of twenty-five cents multiplied by the 31 number of gallons of sustainable aviation fuel produced in 32 this state from feedstock. The sustainable aviation fuel tax 33 credit shall not be available for any sustainable aviation 34 fuel produced before the 2026 calendar year or after the 2035 35 -60- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 60/ 79 H.F. 1054 calendar year. 1 2. The tax credit shall be allowed against taxes imposed 2 under chapter 422, subchapter II or III. 3 3. The tax credit shall be claimed for the tax year during 4 which the eligible business was issued the tax credit. 5 4. An individual may claim a tax credit under this section 6 of a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 7 cooperative organized under chapter 501 and filing as a 8 partnership for federal tax purposes, estate, or trust electing 9 to have income taxed directly to the individual. The amount 10 claimed by the individual shall be based upon the pro rata 11 share of the individualâs earnings from the partnership, 12 limited liability company, S corporation, cooperative, estate, 13 or trust. 14 5. Any tax credit in excess of the tax liability is 15 refundable. In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer 16 may elect to have the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs 17 final, completed return credited to the tax liability for the 18 following tax year. 19 6. a. To claim a tax credit under this section, a taxpayer 20 shall include one or more tax credit certificates with the 21 taxpayerâs tax return. 22 b. The tax credit certificate shall contain the taxpayerâs 23 name, address, tax identification number, the amount of the 24 credit, the name of the eligible business, and any other 25 information required by the department of revenue. 26 c. The tax credit certificate, unless rescinded by the 27 authority, shall be accepted by the department of revenue as 28 payment for taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 422, subchapters 29 II and III, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by 30 the authority upon the face of the tax credit certificate and 31 subject to the limitations of the program. 32 d. Tax credit certificates issued pursuant to this section 33 are not transferable. 34 7. a. The maximum amount of tax credits the authority may 35 -61- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 61/ 79 H.F. 1054 issue each fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be as 1 provided in section 15.119. 2 b. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that the authority 3 may issue to an eligible business for the production of 4 sustainable aviation fuel in a calendar year shall not exceed 5 one million dollars. 6 (2) The authority shall not issue more than five tax credit 7 certificates to an eligible business for the production of 8 sustainable aviation fuel under the program. 9 Sec. 123. NEW SECTION . 15.534 Reports to general assembly. 10 1. For purposes of this section, âsuccessful tax credit 11 applicantâ includes, with respect to each fiscal year, an 12 eligible business that was issued a tax credit certificate for 13 production of sustainable aviation fuel during that fiscal 14 year. 15 2. The annual report under section 15.107B shall include 16 a report, developed in cooperation with the department of 17 revenue, describing the activities of the program for the 18 previous fiscal year. The report shall, at a minimum, include 19 all of the following information: 20 a. The aggregate number of gallons of sustainable aviation 21 fuel produced for which successful tax credit applicants 22 received a tax credit in the previous calendar year. 23 b. For each eligible business issued a sustainable aviation 24 fuel tax credit during each calendar year: 25 (1) The identity of the eligible business. 26 (2) The amount of the tax credit. 27 c. The total amount of all sustainable aviation fuel tax 28 credits claimed during each calendar year, and the portion of 29 the claims issued as a refund. 30 3. To protect the presumption of confidentiality 31 established pursuant to section 15.532, the board shall report 32 all information in an aggregate form to prevent, as much as 33 possible, information being attributable to any particular 34 eligible business, except as provided in subsection 2. 35 -62- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 62/ 79 H.F. 1054 Sec. 124. NEW SECTION . 15.535 Future repeal. 1 Sections 15.530, 15.531, 15.532, 15.533, 15.534, and this 2 section are repealed January 1, 2037. 3 Sec. 125. NEW SECTION . 422.10C Sustainable aviation fuel 4 tax credit. 5 The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 6 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a sustainable 7 aviation fuel tax credit allowed under section 15.533. This 8 section is repealed January 1, 2037. 9 Sec. 126. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding 10 the following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 23. The taxes imposed under this subchapter 12 shall be reduced by a sustainable aviation fuel tax credit 13 allowed under section 15.533. This subsection is repealed 14 January 1, 2037. 15 Sec. 127. TAX CREDIT CLAIMS. Sustainable aviation fuel tax 16 credits issued pursuant to the sustainable aviation tax credit 17 program enacted in this division of this Act shall not be 18 issued by the economic development authority prior to July 1, 19 2026, and shall not be claimed by a taxpayer prior to September 20 1, 2026. 21 Sec. 128. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 22 designate sections 15.530 through 15.535, as enacted in this 23 division of this Act, as part 36 of subchapter II. 24 Sec. 129. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 25 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 26 Sec. 130. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 27 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years 28 beginning on or after that date. 29 DIVISION XVI 30 MAJOR ECONOMIC GROWTH ATTRACTION PROGRAM 31 Sec. 131. Section 15.494, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. If the eligible business fails to comply with any 34 requirements of the program or the agreement as determined 35 -63- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 63/ 79 H.F. 1054 by the authority , the eligible business may be required to 1 repay any tax incentives the authority issued to the eligible 2 business. A After a final determination, the authority shall 3 notify the department of revenue of any required repayment of 4 a tax incentive shall . Any repayment shall be considered a 5 tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by 6 any taxpayer that claimed the tax incentive, and the failure 7 to make the repayment may be treated by the department of 8 revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown 9 due, or required to be shown due, with the filing of a return or 10 deposit form. In addition, the county shall have the authority 11 to take action to recover the value of property taxes not 12 collected as a result of the exemption provided to the business 13 under this part. 14 Sec. 132. Section 15.495, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 2. To receive the sales and use tax refund, the eligible 17 business shall file a claim with the department of revenue as 18 follows: 19 a. The contractor or subcontractor shall state under oath, 20 on forms provided by the department of revenue, the amount of 21 the sales of tangible personal property or services rendered, 22 furnished, or performed including water, sewer, gas, and 23 electric utility services upon which sales or use tax has 24 been paid prior to contract completion during the period for 25 which the refund is claimed , and shall submit the forms to the 26 eligible business before contract completion. 27 b. The eligible business shall inform the department of 28 revenue in writing of contract completion. The eligible 29 business shall, after contract completion no more frequently 30 than quarterly , submit an application to the department 31 of revenue for a refund of the amount of the sales and use 32 taxes paid pursuant to chapter 423 upon any tangible personal 33 property, or services rendered, furnished, or performed, 34 including water, sewer, gas, and electric utility services. 35 -64- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 64/ 79 H.F. 1054 The application shall be submitted in the form and manner 1 prescribed by the department of revenue. The department of 2 revenue shall audit the application and, if approved, issue 3 a warrant or warrants to the eligible business in the amount 4 of the sales or use tax which has been paid to the state of 5 Iowa under subsection 1 . The eligible businessâs application 6 must be submitted to the department of revenue within one year 7 after the project completion date. An application filed by the 8 eligible business in accordance with this section shall not be 9 denied by reason of a time limitation for filing a refund claim 10 set forth in chapter 421 or 423 section 423.47 . 11 c. The refund shall be remitted by the department of revenue 12 to the eligible business equally over five tax years as soon as 13 practicable after completion of an audit pursuant to paragraph 14 âbâ . Interest shall not accrue on any part of the refund that 15 has not yet been remitted by the department of revenue to the 16 eligible business. 17 DIVISION XVII 18 MASS LAYOFFS AND BUSINESS CLOSURES 19 Sec. 133. NEW SECTION . 15.112 Mass layoffs and business 20 closures. 21 If an entity that is awarded a tax incentive or other 22 financial assistance under any of the programs administered by 23 the authority experiences a business closure or a mass layoff 24 for which notice is required under chapter 84C, the authority 25 may reduce or eliminate some or all of the financial assistance 26 awarded by the authority to the entity. 27 DIVISION XVIII 28 CONFORMING CHANGES 29 Sec. 134. Section 8.55, subsection 3, paragraph f, 30 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), as enacted by 2025 31 Iowa Acts, Senate File 619, section 82, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 (a) Disaster aid provided to businesses engaged in disaster 34 recovery as described in chapter 15, subchapter II, part 13 35 -65- LSB 1186HV (3) 91 nls/ko 65/ 79 H.F. 1054 section 15.111 , and housing businesses engaged in disaster 1 recovery housing projects as defined in section 15.354, 2 subsection 6. 3 Sec. 135. 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 975, section 10, if 4 enacted, is amended to read as follows: 5 SEC. 10. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of this 6 division of this Act, any unencumbered or unobligated moneys 7 remaining in the brownfield redevelopment fund created in 8 section 15.293 are transferred to a fund or funds established 9 pursuant to section 15.335B 15.111 , subsection 1, paragraph 10 âaâ, as determined by the economic development authority. 11